b2g/liblouis/jni/liblouis-c/tables/B2G-gr.ctb
# Small Iota with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F33 24
correct "\x1F33" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F34 24
correct "\x1F34" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F35 24
correct "\x1F35" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Psili and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F36 24
correct "\x1F36" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Dasia and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F37 24
correct "\x1F37" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03B9"

# Capital Iota with Psili
uppercase \x1F38 24
correct "\x1F38" "\x1FBF\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Dasia
uppercase \x1F39 24
correct "\x1F39" "\x1FFE\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Psili and Varia
uppercase \x1F3A 24
correct "\x1F3A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F3B 24
correct "\x1F3B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Psili and Oxia
uppercase \x1F3C 24
correct "\x1F3C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F3D 24
correct "\x1F3D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Psili and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F3E 24
correct "\x1F3E" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Dasia and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F3F 24
correct "\x1F3F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x0399"

# Small Omicron with Psili
lowercase \x1F40 135
correct "\x1F40" "\x1FBF\x03BF"

# Small Omicron with Dasia
lowercase \x1F41 135
correct "\x1F41" "\x1FFE\x03BF"

# Small Omicron with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F42 135
correct "\x1F42" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03BF"

# Small Omicron with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F43 135
correct "\x1F43" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03BF"

# Small Omicron with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F44 135
correct "\x1F44" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03BF"

# Small Omicron with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F45 135
correct "\x1F45" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03BF"

# Capital Omicron with Psili
uppercase \x1F48 135
correct "\x1F48" "\x1FBF\x039F"

# Capital Omicron with Dasia
uppercase \x1F49 135
correct "\x1F49" "\x1FFE\x039F"

# Capital Omicron with Psili and Varia
uppercase \x1F4A 135
correct "\x1F4A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x039F"

# Capital Omicron with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F4B 135
correct "\x1F4B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x039F"

# Capital Omicron with Psili and Oxia
uppercase \x1F4C 135
correct "\x1F4C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x039F"

# Capital Omicron with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F4D 135
correct "\x1F4D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x039F"

# Small Upsilon with Psili
lowercase \x1F50 13456
correct "\x1F50" "\x1FBF\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dasia
lowercase \x1F51 13456
correct "\x1F51" "\x1FFE\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F52 13456
correct "\x1F52" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F53 13456
correct "\x1F53" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F54 13456
correct "\x1F54" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F55 13456
correct "\x1F55" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Psili and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F56 13456
correct "\x1F56" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dasia and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F57 13456
correct "\x1F57" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03C5"

# Capital Upsilon with Dasia
uppercase \x1F59 13456
correct "\x1F59" "\x1FFE\x03A5"

# Capital Upsilon with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F5B 13456
correct "\x1F5B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03A5"

# Capital Upsilon with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F5D 13456
correct "\x1F5D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03A5"

# Capital Upsilon with Dasia and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F5F 13456
correct "\x1F5F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03A5"

# Small Omega with Psili
lowercase \x1F60 245
correct "\x1F60" "\x1FBF\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Dasia
lowercase \x1F61 245
correct "\x1F61" "\x1FFE\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F62 245
correct "\x1F62" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F63 245
correct "\x1F63" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F64 245
correct "\x1F64" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F65 245
correct "\x1F65" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Psili and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F66 245
correct "\x1F66" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F67 245
correct "\x1F67" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03C9"

# Capital Omega with Psili
uppercase \x1F68 245
correct "\x1F68" "\x1FBF\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia
uppercase \x1F69 245
correct "\x1F69" "\x1FFE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Varia
uppercase \x1F6A 245
correct "\x1F6A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F6B 245
correct "\x1F6B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Oxia
uppercase \x1F6C 245
correct "\x1F6C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F6D 245
correct "\x1F6D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F6E 245
correct "\x1F6E" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F6F 245
correct "\x1F6F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03A9"

# Small Alpha with Varia
lowercase \x1F70 1
correct "\x1F70" "\x1FEF\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Oxia
lowercase \x1F71 1
correct "\x1F71" "\x1FFD\x03B1"

# Small Epsilon with Varia
lowercase \x1F72 15
correct "\x1F72" "\x1FEF\x03B5"

# Small Epsilon with Oxia
lowercase \x1F73 15
correct "\x1F73" "\x1FFD\x03B5"

# Small Eta with Varia
lowercase \x1F74 345
correct "\x1F74" "\x1FEF\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Oxia
lowercase \x1F75 345
correct "\x1F75" "\x1FFD\x03B7"

# Small Iota with Varia
lowercase \x1F76 24
correct "\x1F76" "\x1FEF\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Oxia
lowercase \x1F77 24
correct "\x1F77" "\x1FFD\x03B9"

# Small Omicron with Varia
lowercase \x1F78 135
correct "\x1F78" "\x1FEF\x03BF"

# Small Omicron with Oxia
lowercase \x1F79 135
correct "\x1F79" "\x1FFD\x03BF"

# Small Upsilon with Varia
lowercase \x1F7A 13456
correct "\x1F7A" "\x1FEF\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Oxia
lowercase \x1F7B 13456
correct "\x1F7B" "\x1FFD\x03C5"

# Small Omega with Varia
lowercase \x1F7C 245
correct "\x1F7C" "\x1FEF\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Oxia
lowercase \x1F7D 245
correct "\x1F7D" "\x1FFD\x03C9"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F80 35
correct "\x1F80" "\x1FBF\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F81 35
correct "\x1F81" "\x1FFE\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F82 35
correct "\x1F82" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F83 35
correct "\x1F83" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F84 35
correct "\x1F84" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F85 35
correct "\x1F85" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F86 35
correct "\x1F86" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F87 35
correct "\x1F87" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x1FB3"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F88 1
correct "\x1F88" "\x1FBF\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F89 1
correct "\x1F89" "\x1FFE\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Varia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F8A 1
correct "\x1F8A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Varia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F8B 1
correct "\x1F8B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Oxia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F8C 1
correct "\x1F8C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Oxia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F8D 1
correct "\x1F8D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Perispomeni and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F8E 1
correct "\x1F8E" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x1FBE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Perispomeni and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F8F 1
correct "\x1F8F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x1FBE\x0391"

# Small Eta with Psili and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F90 3456
correct "\x1F90" "\x1FBF\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F91 3456
correct "\x1F91" "\x1FFE\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Psili and Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F92 3456
correct "\x1F92" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F93 3456
correct "\x1F93" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Psili and Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F94 3456
correct "\x1F94" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F95 3456
correct "\x1F95" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Psili and Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F96 3456
correct "\x1F96" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1F97 3456
correct "\x1F97" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x1FC3"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F98 345
correct "\x1F98" "\x1FBF\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F99 345
correct "\x1F99" "\x1FFE\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Varia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F9A 345
correct "\x1F9A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Varia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F9B 345
correct "\x1F9B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Oxia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F9C 345
correct "\x1F9C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Oxia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F9D 345
correct "\x1F9D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Perispomeni and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F9E 345
correct "\x1F9E" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x1FBE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Perispomeni and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1F9F 345
correct "\x1F9F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x1FBE\x0397"

# Small Omega with Psili and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA0 2456
correct "\x1FA0" "\x1FBF\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA1 2456
correct "\x1FA1" "\x1FFE\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Psili and Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA2 2456
correct "\x1FA2" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA3 2456
correct "\x1FA3" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Psili and Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA4 2456
correct "\x1FA4" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA5 2456
correct "\x1FA5" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Psili and Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA6 2456
correct "\x1FA6" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Dasia and Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FA7 2456
correct "\x1FA7" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x1FF3"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FA8 245
correct "\x1FA8" "\x1FBF\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FA9 245
correct "\x1FA9" "\x1FFE\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Varia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FAA 245
correct "\x1FAA" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Varia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FAB 245
correct "\x1FAB" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Oxia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FAC 245
correct "\x1FAC" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Oxia and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FAD 245
correct "\x1FAD" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Psili and Perispomeni and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FAE 245
correct "\x1FAE" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Dasia and Perispomeni and Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FAF 245
correct "\x1FAF" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x1FBE\x03A9"

# Small Alpha with Vrachy
lowercase \x1FB0 1
correct "\x1FB0" "\x02D8\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Macron
lowercase \x1FB1 1
correct "\x1FB1" "\x00AF\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FB2 35
correct "\x1FB2" "\x1FEF\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FB4 35
correct "\x1FB4" "\x1FFD\x1FB3"

# Small Alpha with Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FB6 1
correct "\x1FB6" "\x1FC0\x03B1"
